Utah statutes.
58-26a-401.    Grounds for denial of license -- Disciplinary proceedings.

Grounds for refusing to issue a license to an applicant, for refusing to renew the license of a licensee, for revoking, suspending, restricting, or placing on probation the license of a licensee, for issuing a public or private reprimand to a licensee, and for issuing a cease and desist order shall be in accordance with Section 58-1-401.



Enacted by Chapter 261, 2000 General Session

